ro-RO: Scopul seringii medicale: Injecție; Irigare; Intubare; Altele
tr: Tıbbi Şırınganın Amacı: Enjeksiyon; Sulama; Boru; Diğer
en: Medical syringe purpose: Injection; Irrigation; Tubing; Other
pt-PT: Finalidade da seringa médica: Injeção; Irrigação; Tubagem; Outro
ko: 의료용 주사기 용도: 주사; 세척; 튜브; 기타
el: Σκοπός ιατρικής σύριγγας: Ένεση; Καταιονισμός; Σωλήνωση; Άλλο
zh-TW: 醫用注射器用途: 注射; 沖洗; 管子; 其他
cs: Účel stříkačky: Injekce; Zavodňování; Trubičky; Jiné
bg-BG: Предназначение на медицинска спринцовка: Инжектиране; Напояване; Тръби; Други
it: Utilizzo della siringa medica: Iniezione; Irrigazione; Tiralatte; Altro
de: Zweck der medizinischen Spritze: Injektion; Spülung; Zugang; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Finalidade da seringa médica: Injeção; Irrigação; Tubulação; Outro
hu: Orvosi fecskendő célja: Injekció; Irrigálás; Drénezés; Egyéb
ru: Назначение медицинского шприца: Инъекция; Промывание; Трубка; Другое
es: Uso de la jeringa médica: Inyección; Irrigación; Tubos; Otros
fi: Lääkinnällisen ruiskun tarkoitus: Injektio; Kastelu; Letkustot; Muu
ja: 医療用シリンジの用途: 注射; イリゲーション; チューブ; その他
hr-HR: Namjena medicinske šprice: Injekcija; Irigacija; Tubiranje; Ostalo
nl: Doel medische spuit: Injectie; Uitspoelen; Slangen; Andere
zh-CN: 医用注射器用途: 注射; 冲洗; 导管; 其他
pl: Przeznaczenie strzykawki medycznej: Wprowadzenie danych; Nawadnianie; Świetlówka; Inne
vi: Mục đích của ống tiêm y tế: Tiêm; Tưới; Đặt ống; Khác
lt-LT: Medicininio švirkšto paskirtis: Injekcija; Praplovimas; Vamzdeliai; Kita
nb: Medisinsk sprøyteformål: Injeksjon; Skylling; Slanger; Annet
da: Medicinsk sprøjteformål: Indsprøjtning; Vanding; Slanger; Andet
sl-SI: Namen medicinske brizge: Injekcija; Izpiranje; Tubiranje; Drugo
sv: Syfte för medicinsk spruta: Injektion; Bevattning; Slangar; Övrigt
fr: Objectif de la seringue médicale: Injection; Irrigation; Tubes; Autre
th: วัตถุประสงค์ของเข็มฉีดยาทางการแพทย์: การฉีด; การชะล้าง; การสอดท่อ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Účel lekárskej striekačky: Injekcia; Zavlažovanie; Hadičky; Iné